hr-HR: Kratki blok sklopa saldo tip: Vanjsko balansiranje; Unutarnje balansiranje; Neutralno balansiranje; Drugo
hu: Rövid blokk kiegyensúlyozásának típusa: Külső kiegyensúlyozás; Belső kiegyensúlyozás; Semleges kiegyensúlyozás; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta uravnoteženja sklopa delnega motorja : Zunanje uravnoteženje; Notranje uravnoteženje; Nevtralno uravnoteženje; Drugo
th: ประเภทสมดุลชุดประกอบบล็อกสั้น: บาลานซ์ภายนอก; บาลานซ์ภายใน; บาลานซ์สมดุล; อื่นๆ
da: Balanceringstype for short block-samling: Eksternt afbalanceret; Internt afbalanceret; Neutralt afbalanceret; Andet
vi: Loại cân bằng cụm khối ngắn: Cân bằng ngoài; Cân bằng trong; Cân bằng trung tính; Khác
zh-CN: 短缸体组件平衡类型: 外部平衡; 内部平衡; 中性平衡; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de echilibrare a ansamblului motor scurt: Echilibrare externă; Echilibrare internă; Echilibrare neutră; Altele
ja: ショートブロックアセンブリのバランスタイプ: 外部バランス; 内部バランス; ニュートラルバランス; その他
bg-BG: Тип баланс на сглобката на късия блок на двигателя: Външен баланс; Вътрешен баланс; Неутрален баланс; Друго
lt-LT: Trumpojo variklio bloko mazgo balansavimo tipas: Išorinis balansavimas; Vidinis balansavimas; Neutralus balansavimas; Kita
cs: Typ vyvážení sestavy krátkého bloku: Vnější vyvážení; Vnitřní vyvážení; Neutrální vyvážení; Jiné
es: Tipo de balanceo del conjunto de bloque corto: Balance externo; Balance interno; Balance neutro; Otro
it: Tipo di bilanciamento del gruppo short block: Bilanciatura esterna; Bilanciatura interna; Bilanciatura neutra; Altro
de: Auswuchtungsart der Shortblock-Baugruppe: Externe Wuchtung; Interne Wuchtung; Neutrale Wuchtung; Sonstige
tr: Kısa blok balans tipi: Dıştan balanslı; İçten balanslı; Nötr balanslı; Diğer
en: Short block assembly balance type: External balance; Internal balance; Neutral balance; Other
el: Τύπος εξισορρόπησης συγκροτήματος κάτω μέρους κινητήρα: Εξωτερικό ζύγισμα; Εσωτερικό ζύγισμα; Ουδέτερο ζύγισμα; Άλλο
sv: Balanseringstyp för kortblocksmontering: Extern balansering; Intern balansering; Neutral balansering; Annat
sk-SK: Typ vyváženia zostavy krátkeho bloku: Externé vyváženie; Interné vyváženie; Neutrálne vyváženie; Iné
nb: Typ monteringsbalanse for kort veivaksel: Ekstern balansering; Intern balansering; Nøytral balansering; Annet
pt-BR: Bloco parcial do motor tipo de balanceamento do conjunto: Balanceamento externo; Balanceamento interno; Balanceamento neutro; Outros
nl: Short block montage balanstype: Externe balans; Interne balans; Neutrale balans; Overig
fi: Perusmoottorikokoonpanon tasapainotuksen tyyppi: Ulkoinen tasapainotus; Sisäinen tasapainotus; Neutraali tasapainotus; Muu
zh-TW: 中缸組件平衡類型: 外部平衡; 內部平衡; 中性平衡; 其他
ru: Тип балансировки шорт-блока: Внешняя балансировка; Внутренняя балансировка; Нейтральная балансировка; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de equilíbrio do conjunto do bloco curto: Equilíbrio externo; Equilíbrio interno; Equilíbrio neutro; Outro
ko: 쇼트 블록 어셈블리 밸런스 유형: 외부 밸런스; 내부 밸런스; 중립 밸런스; 기타
fr: Type d’équilibrage du bloc embiellé: Équilibrage externe; Équilibrage interne; Équilibrage neutre; Autre
pl: Typ wyważenia zespołu krótkiego bloku: Wyważenie zewnętrzne; Wyważenie wewnętrzne; Wyważenie neutralne; Inne